de: Konfiguration des Uilleann-Pipes-Sets: Full Set (Half Set + Regulatoren); Half Set (Practice Set + Bordune); Practice Set (Blasebalg + Luftsack + Chanter); Sonstiges
zh-CN: 爱尔兰风笛套装配置: 全套（半套 + 调节管）; 半套（练习套 + 蜂鸣管）; 练习套（风箱 + 气袋 + 旋律管）; 其他
ko: 일리언 파이프 세트 구성: 풀 세트(하프 세트 + 레귤레이터); 하프 세트(연습용 세트 + 드론); 연습용 세트(벨로우즈 + 백 + 챈터); 기타
en: Uilleann pipes set configuration: Full set (half set + regulators); Half set (practice set + drones); Practice set (bellows + bag + chanter); Other
sl-SI: Konfiguracija kompleta irskih dud: Polni set (polovični set in regulatorji); Polovični set (set za vajo in burdoni); Set za vajo (meh, vreča in piščal); Drugo
th: รูปแบบการจัดชุดองค์ประกอบของปี่ไอริช: ชุดเต็ม (ชุดครึ่ง + เร็กกูเลเตอร์); ชุดครึ่ง (ชุดซ้อม + โดรน); ชุดซ้อม (เบลโลว์ + ถุงลม + ชานเตอร์); อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Uilleann pipes configuração do conjunto: Set completo (meio set + reguladores); Set meio (set de prática + bordões); Set de prática (fole + saco + ponteira); Outro
fr: Configuration de l’ensemble de cornemuses irlandaises Uilleann: Set complet (demi-set et régulateurs); Demi-set (practice set et bourdons); Practice set (soufflet, poche et chanter); Autre
ja: イリアンパイプセット構成: フルセット (ハーフセット＋レギュレーター); ハーフセット (プラクティスセット＋ドローン); プラクティスセット (ベローズ＋バッグ＋チャンター); その他
nl: Uilleann pipes setconfiguratie: Volledige set (halve set + regulators); Halve set (oefenset + drones); Oefenset (blaasbalg + zak + chanter); Anders
pl: Konfiguracja zestawu dud uilleann: Pełny zestaw (półzestaw + regulatory); Półzestaw (zestaw do ćwiczeń + burdony); Zestaw do ćwiczeń (mieszek + worek + przebierka); Inne
bg-BG: Конфигурация на комплекта ирландска гайда: Пълен комплект (полукомплект + регулатори); Полукомплект (учебен комплект + ручила); Учебен комплект (мях + торба + гайдуница); Друга
ru: Конфигурация набора ирландской волынки: Полный сет (полусет + регуляторы); Полусет (практис сет + дроны); Практис сет (мехи + мешок + чантер); Другое
cs: Konfigurace sady irských loketních dud: Plná sada (poloviční sada + regulátory); Poloviční sada (cvičná sada + borduny); Cvičná sada (měch + vak + chanter); Ostatní
fi: Irlantilaisen säkkipillin pillikokoonpano: Täysi sarja (puolikas sarja ja säätimet); Puolikas sarja (harjoitussarja ja borduunat); Harjoitussarja (palkeet, pussi ja melodiapilli); Muu
it: Configurazione del set di uilleann pipes: Set completo (mezzo set + regolatori); Mezzo set (set da studio + bordoni); Set da studio (mantice + sacca + chanter); Altro
hu: Uilleann duda csőkészlet-konfiguráció: Teljes készlet (félkészlet + regulátorok); Félkészlet (gyakorlókészlet + drónok); Gyakorlókészlet (fújtató + légzsák + dallamsíp); Egyéb
ro-RO: Configurația setului de cimpoi Uilleann: Set complet (jumătate de set + regulatoare); Jumătate de set (set de exersat + burdoane); Set de exersat (burduf + sac + chanter); Altele
sk-SK: Konfigurácia nastavenia írske gajdy: Úplná súprava (polovičná súprava + regulátory); Polovičná súprava (cvičná súprava + bordúny); Cvičná súprava (mechy + vak + melodická píšťala); Iná
el: Διαμόρφωση σετ ιρλανδικής γκάιντας: Πλήρες σετ (μισό σετ + ρυθμιστές); Μισό σετ (σετ εξάσκησης + ισοκράτες); Σετ εξάσκησης (φυσερό + ασκός + αυλός); Άλλο
sv: Uilleannpipset – konfiguration: Helt set (halvt set + regulatorer); Halvt set (övningsset + borduner); Övningsset (bälg + säck + spelpipa); Annat
vi: Cấu hình bộ ống Uilleann: Bộ đầy đủ (bộ nửa + ống điểu âm); Bộ nửa (bộ tập + ống đệm); Bộ tập (ống thổi + túi + ống giai điệu); Khác
nb: Konfigurasjon av uilleann-pipesett: Fullt sett (halvt sett + regulatorer); Halvt sett (øvingssett + droner); Øvingssett (belg + sekk + chanter); Annet
zh-TW: 愛爾蘭風笛組配置: 全套 (半套 + 調節管); 半套 (練習套件 + 蜂鳴管); 練習套件 (風箱 + 氣囊 + 旋律管); 其他
lt-LT: Uilleann dūdmaišių rinkinio konfigūracija: Pilnas komplektas (pusė komplekto + reguliatoriai); Pusė komplekto (mokomasis komplektas + burdonai); Mokomasis komplektas (dumplės + maišas + melodinis vamzdis); Kita
tr: Uilleann boru seti konfigürasyonu: Tam set (yarım set + regülatörler); Yarım set (pratik seti + dronlar); Pratik seti (körük + tulum + melodi borusu); Diğer
pt-PT: Configuração do conjunto da gaita de foles irlandesa: Conjunto completo (meio conjunto + reguladores); Meio conjunto (conjunto de prática + bordões); Conjunto de prática (fole + saco + ponteira); Outro
da: Sætkonfiguration for uilleann pipes: Fuldt sæt (halvt sæt + regulatorer); Halvt sæt (øvesæt + droner); Øvesæt (blæsebælg + taske + chanter); Andet
hr-HR: Konfiguracija skupa cijevi Uilleann: Puni set (pola seta + regulatori); Pola seta (set za vježbu + borduni); Set za vježbu (mjeh + vreća + piskalica); Ostalo
es: Configuración del set de cornamusas irlandesas: Juego completo (medio juego + reguladores); Medio juego (juego de práctica + bordones); Juego de práctica (fuelle + bolsa + puntero); Otro